Utah statutes.
64-13e-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Actual state daily incarceration rate" means the daily incarceration rate that reflects the actual expenses of the department, including:

(a)  executive overhead;

(b)  administrative overhead;

(c)  transportation overhead;

(d)  division overhead;

(e)  motor pool expenses;

(f)  medical expenses;

(g)  mental health expenses;

(h)  dental expenses;

(i)  straight line capital depreciation, over a 40-year period, for prison facilities of the department; and

(j)  expenses for treatment, including substance abuse treatment, alcohol abuse treatment, and sex offender treatment.

(2)  "CCJJ" means the Utah Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, created in Section 63M-7-201.

(3)  "Department" means the Department of Corrections.

(4)  "Division of Finance" means the Division of Finance, created in Section 63A-3-101.

(5)  "Final state daily incarceration rate" means the average actual state daily incarceration rate, calculated, reviewed, and discussed under Section 64-13e-105, and approved by the Legislature under Subsection 64-13e-105(3).

(6)  "State inmate" means a person, other than a state probationary inmate or state parole inmate, who is committed to the custody of the department.

(7)  "State parole inmate" means a person who is:

(a)  on parole, as defined in Section 77-27-1; and

(b)  housed in a county jail for a reason related to the person's parole.

(8)  "State probationary inmate" means a felony probationer sentenced to time in a county jail under Subsection 77-18-1(8).

(9)  "Treatment program" means:

(a)  an alcohol treatment program;

(b)  a substance abuse treatment program; or

(c)  a sex offender treatment program.

